Hawaii statutes.
§432:1-616 Cancer treatment. (a) All
individual and group hospital and medical service plan contracts that include
coverage or benefits for the treatment of cancer shall provide payment or
reimbursement for all types of chemotherapy that are considered medically
necessary as defined in section 432E-1.4.

(b) The cost-sharing for generic and
non-generic oral chemotherapy shall be provided at the same or lower amount or
percentage as is applied to generic and non-generic intravenously administered
chemotherapy; provided that an insurer shall not increase the cost-share for
intravenously administered chemotherapy in order to achieve compliance with
this subsection.

(c) Individual and group hospital and medical
service plan contracts shall not increase enrollee cost-sharing for non-generic
medications used for the treatment of cancer to any greater extent than such
policies increase enrollee cost-sharing for other covered non-generic
medication.

(d) For the purposes of this section:

"Cost-share" or "cost-sharing"
means copayment, coinsurance, or deductible provisions applicable to coverage
for medications or treatments.

"Intravenously administered
chemotherapy" means a physician-prescribed cancer treatment that is
administered through injection directly into the patient's circulatory system
by a physician, physician assistant, nurse practitioner, nurse, or other
medical personnel under the supervision of a physician and in a hospital,
medical office, or other clinical setting.

"Oral chemotherapy" means a United
States Food and Drug Administration-approved, physician-prescribed cancer
treatment that is taken orally in the form of a tablet or capsule and may be
administered in a hospital, medical office, or other clinical setting or may be
delivered to the patient for self-administration under the direction or
supervision of a physician outside of a hospital, medical office, or other
clinical setting.

(e) This section shall not apply to an
accident-only, specified disease, hospital indemnity, long-term care, or other
limited-benefit health insurance policy. [L 2009, c 168, §2; am L 2012, c 30, §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next